Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.970

Law enforcement mobilization—Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Agency" means any general purpose law enforcement agency as defined in RCW 10.93.020.

(2) "Board" means the state law enforcement mobilization policy board.

(3) "Chief" means the chief of the Washington state patrol.

(4) "Chief law enforcement officer" means the chief of police or sheriff responsible for law enforcement services in the jurisdiction in which the emergency is occurring.

(5) "General authority Washington peace officer" means a general authority Washington peace officer as defined in RCW 10.93.020.

(6) "Host agency" means the law enforcement agency that requests statewide mobilization under RCW 43.43.970 through 43.43.975.

(7) "Mobilization" means a redistribution of regional and statewide law enforcement resources in response to an emergency or disaster situation.

(8) "Mutual aid" means emergency interagency assistance provided without compensation pursuant to an agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW.

(9) "Resource coordination" means the effort to locate and arrange for the delivery of resources needed by chief law enforcement officers.

(10) "State law enforcement resource coordinator" means a designated individual or agency selected by the chief to perform the responsibilities of that position.

[ 2003 c 405 s 6.]

NOTES:

Legislative declaration and intent—2003 c 405: "(1) Because of the possibility of a disaster of unprecedented size and destruction, including acts of domestic terrorism and civil unrest, that requires law enforcement response for the protection of persons or property and preservation of the peace, the need exists to ensure that the state is adequately prepared to respond to such an incident. There is a need to (a) establish a mechanism and a procedure to provide for reimbursement to law enforcement agencies that respond to help others in time of need, and to host law enforcement agencies that experience expenses beyond the resources of the agencies; and (b) generally to protect the public safety, peace, health, lives, and property of the people of Washington.

(2) It is hereby declared necessary to:

(a) Provide the policy and organizational structure for large-scale mobilization of law enforcement resources in the state, using the incident command system, through creation of the Washington state law enforcement mobilization plan;

(b) Confer upon the chief of the Washington state patrol the powers provided in this chapter;

(c) Provide a means for reimbursement to law enforcement jurisdictions that incur expenses when mobilized by the chief under the Washington state law enforcement mobilization plan; and

(d) Provide for reimbursement of the host law enforcement agency when it has:

(i) Exhausted all of its resources; and

(ii) Invoked its local mutual aid network and exhausted those resources." [ 2003 c 405 s 5.]